Arkansas, session 2025, HB1444.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-52-456 is amended to read as follows:
26-52-456. Data centers — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Data center equipment” means computer equipment, or
software, and related equipment and services purchased or leased either for
immediate use or stored for future use in this state for the processing,
storage, retrieval, or communication of data, including without limitation:
(A) A server, router, connection, and other enabling
machinery, equipment, software, and hardware, regardless of whether the
property is affixed to or incorporated into real property;
(B) Equipment used in the operation of a computer or
computer software or for the benefit of a qualified data center or a
qualified large data center, including without limitation a component part,
installation, refreshment, replacement, and upgrade, regardless of whether
the property is affixed to or incorporated into real property;
(C) Equipment necessary for the transformation,
generation, distribution, storage, or management of electricity that is
required to operate a computer server or other data center equipment,
*JLL187*
03-20-2025 14:13:32 JLL187

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 S3/20/25 HB1444
including without limitation a substation, generator, uninterruptible energy
equipment, supply, conduit, fuel piping and storage, cabling, duct bank,
switch, switchboard, battery, testing equipment, and backup generator;
(D) Equipment necessary to cool and maintain a controlled
environment for the operation of the computer servers and other components of
the qualified data center or the qualified large data center, including
without limitation a chiller, mechanical equipment, refrigerant piping, fuel
piping and storage, adiabatic and free cooling system, cooling tower, water
softener, air handling unit, indoor direct exchange unit, fan, ducting, and
filter;
(E) Water conservation systems, including without
limitation a facility or mechanism that is designed to collect, conserve, and
reuse water;
(F) Computer server equipment, chassis, networking
equipment, switches, racks, fiber optic and copper cabling, trays, and
conduit;
(G) Conduit, ducting, and fiber optic and copper cabling
that may be located outside the qualified data center or the qualified large
data center that is directly related to connecting one (1) or more
distributed qualified data center or qualified large data center locations;
(H) Monitoring equipment and security systems;
(I) Software;
(J) Other tangible personal property and intangible
personal property that is essential to the operation of a qualified data
center or a qualified large data center, excluding property used in the
administration of the facility;
(K) Modular data centers and preassembled components of an
item described in subdivisions (a)(1)(A)-(J) of this section, including
without limitation components used in the manufacturing of modular data
centers; and
(L) Labor services to install, apply, repair, service,
alter, or maintain items described in subdivisions (a)(1)(A)-(K) of this
section;
(2) “Eligible data center costs” means expenditures for the
development, acquisition, construction, expansion, renovation, refurbishment,
maintenance, and operation of a qualified data center or a qualified large
03-20-2025 14:13:32 JLL187

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 S3/20/25 HB1444
data center, including without limitation costs of land, buildings, site
improvements, modular data centers, computer data center equipment
acquisition and permitting, lease payments, site characterization and
assessment, engineering, and design used directly and exclusively in a
qualified data center or a qualified large data center;
(3) “Facility” means one (1) or more contiguous a tract or
adjacent tracts of land in the state and any structure and tangible personal
property contained on that land that is for the operation of a qualified data
center or a qualified large data center;
(4) “Qualified data center” means a facility, including any
addition to or expansion of the facility, that:
(A) Is developed, acquired, constructed, expanded,
rehabilitated, renovated, repaired, or operated to house a group of networked
computer servers in one (1) physical location or multiple contiguous adjacent
locations to centralize the storage, management, and dissemination of data
and information pertaining to a particular business or classification or body
of knowledge;
(B) Is owned or operated by a qualified firm that:
(i) Creates a qualified investment of at least five
hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) within one hundred million dollars
($100,000,000) at the facility no later than five (5) years of the issuance
of a certificate of occupancy by the relevant local building authority after
construction of the facility commences; and
(ii) Pays, directly or indirectly, an aggregate
annualized compensation of at least one million dollars ($1,000,000),
including compensation paid by the contractors of the qualified firm, to
employees individuals performing services within the state over the two (2)
calendar years following the commencement of calendar year in which the
facility commenced operations; and
(iii) Is not primarily engaged in adding
transactions involving virtual currency to a distributed ledger at the
facility; and
(C) Has received a positive cost-benefit analysis from the
Arkansas Economic Development Commission;
(5) “Qualified firm” means a for-profit business establishment
that is:
03-20-2025 14:13:32 JLL187

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 S3/20/25 HB1444
(A) Subject to state income, sales, or property taxes;
(B) The owner or operator of a qualified data center or a
qualified large data center; and
(C) Engaged in data processing, storage, and
dissemination; and
(6) “Qualified investment” means, with respect to a qualified
data center or a qualified large data center, the aggregate nonduplicative
eligible data center costs expended by an entity with an interest in a
qualified data center or a qualified large data center in the state; and
(7) “Qualified large data center” means a facility, including
any addition to or expansion of the facility, that:
(A) Is developed, acquired, constructed, expanded,
rehabilitated, renovated, repaired, or operated to house a group of networked
computer servers in two (2) or more nonadjacent physical locations that are
connected to each other by fiber and associated equipment required for
operating a fiber transmission network between the location and upstream
internet peering points for the qualified firm that owns or operates the
facility and its affiliates;
(B) Is owned or operated by a qualified firm that:
(i) Creates a qualified investment of at least two
billion dollars ($2,000,000,000) at the facility no later than ten (10) years
after construction of the facility commences;
(ii) Pays, directly or indirectly, an aggregate
annualized compensation of at least three million dollars ($3,000,000),
including compensation paid by the contractors of the qualified firm, to
individuals performing services within the state over the two (2) calendar
years following the calendar year in which the facility commenced operations;
and
(iii) Is not primarily engaged in adding
transactions involving virtual currency to a distributed ledger at the
facility; and
(C) Has received a positive cost-benefit analysis from the
commission.
(b) The gross receipts or gross proceeds from the sale of the
following are exempt from the gross receipts tax levied by this chapter and
the compensating use tax levied by the Arkansas Compensating Tax Act of 1949,
03-20-2025 14:13:32 JLL187

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 S3/20/25 HB1444
§ 26-53-101 et seq.:
(1) Data center equipment;
(2) Eligible data center costs;
(3) Services purchased for the purpose of and in conjunction
with developing, acquiring, constructing, expanding, renovating,
refurbishing, and operating a qualified data center or a qualified large data
center; and
(4) Electricity used by a qualified data center or a qualified
large data center.
(c)(1) A qualified firm shall submit an application for the exemption
provided under this section for a qualified data center or a qualified large
data center to the commission Department of Finance and Administration.
(2) Eligibility for the exemption under this section is
dependent commences on:
(A) For a qualified data center, the minimum qualified
investment and aggregate compensation stated in subdivision (a)(4) of this
section being met within five (5) years from the commencement of construction
of the qualified data center the time period required under subdivision
(a)(4) of this section; and
(B) For a qualified large data center, the minimum
qualified investment and aggregate compensation stated in subdivision (a)(7)
of this section being met within the time period required under subdivision
(a)(7) of this section.
(3)(A) Within thirty (30) days after receipt of a completed
application under this section, the commission department shall grant or deny
the application in whole or in part.
(B) If an application submitted under this section is
denied as incomplete and the qualified firm provides the additional
information or documentation required by the commission department or
otherwise completes its application within fifteen (15) days of the notice of
denial, the application shall be considered completed as of the original date
of submission.
(C) If a qualified firm fails to provide the information
or complete its application within the fifteen-day cure time period provided
in subdivision (c)(3)(B) of this section, the application shall remain denied
and may be resubmitted in full with a new submission date if the qualified
03-20-2025 14:13:32 JLL187

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 S3/20/25 HB1444
firm wants to proceed with the application.
(D) If an application is complete and meets the
requirements of this section, the commission department shall certify that
the qualified data center that or the qualified large data center is eligible
for the exemption provided in this section.
(d)(1) Once an application is approved, the: commission
(A) Department shall transmit an approved financial
incentive certificate to the qualified firm; and
(B) Exemption provided in this section may be claimed by
the qualified data center or the qualified large data center.
(2)(A) If, after a qualified data center is certified as being
eligible for the exemption provided in this section, the qualified firm that
owns or operates the qualified data center intends to own or operate
additional facilities in this state that would meet the requirements of a
qualified large data center when combined with the qualified data center that
has been certified as being eligible for the exemption under this section,
the qualified firm may request that the department recertify that the
qualified data center together with the other facilities is eligible for the
exemption provided under this section as a qualified large data center.
(B) If the department recertifies a qualified data center
as a qualified large data center under subdivision (d)(2)(A) of this section,
the department shall update the approved financial certificate to reflect the
recertification.
(e)(1) After receiving an approved financial incentive certificate
from the commission department, a qualified firm shall certify annually to
the commission the qualified data center's minimum qualified investment and
aggregate annualized compensation at the qualified data center during the
preceding calendar year for the term of the financial incentive certificate
department:
(1) For a qualified data center:
(A) When the minimum qualified investment required
under subdivision (a)(4)(B)(i) of this section has been met; and
(B) For each calendar year in which the qualified
firm is subject to the aggregate compensation requirement under subdivision
(a)(4)(B)(ii) of this section, the aggregate annualized compensation at the
qualified data center for the calendar year; and
03-20-2025 14:13:32 JLL187

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 S3/20/25 HB1444
(2) For a qualified large data center:
(A) When the minimum qualified investment required
under subdivision (a)(7)(B)(i) of this section has been met; and
(B) For each calendar year in which the qualified
firm is subject to the aggregate compensation requirement under subdivision
(a)(7)(B)(ii) of this section, the aggregate annualized compensation at the
qualified large data center for the calendar year.
(2) All data reported to the commission under this subsection
shall be used only to determine eligibility.
(f) If the aggregate annualized compensation at a qualified data
center or a qualified large data center falls below the required aggregate
compensation required under this section, the approved financial incentive
certificate for the qualified firm that owns or operates the qualified data
center or the qualified large data center shall be revoked.
(g)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (g)(2) of this section, if a
qualified large data center fails to meet the requirements of subdivision
(a)(7)(B)(i) of this section, the approved financial incentive certificate
for the qualified firm that owns or operates the qualified data center or the
qualified large data center shall be revoked.
(2)(A) Each facility within a qualified large data center that
independently meets the requirements of a qualified data center under
subdivision (a)(4) of this section continues to be eligible for an exemption
under this section.
(B) The department shall:
(i) Certify each facility that independently meets
the requirements of a qualified data center as being eligible for the
exemption provided in this section; and
(ii) Transmit an approved financial incentive
certificate to the qualified firm that owns or operates the facilities that
independently meet the requirements of a qualified data center.

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective on the
first day of the calendar quarter following the effective date of this act.

/s/Pilkington

03-20-2025 14:13:32 JLL187